Georgia, session 2025_26, HB320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general provisions relative to solid waste management, is amended by adding a
new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 320 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 55 0508S
"12-8-28.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Legitimate recycling facility' means a recovered materials processing facility or any
other recycling center or disposal facility that accepts solar panels for recycling so as to
return a significant portion of the materials recovered from such solar panels to
commerce as a commodity for use in a beneficial and safe manner and that does not,
through its recycling process, adversely impact public health or safety or the
environment.
(2) 'Solar panel' means any device that contains a bank of solar cells or other solar energy
collection system that when exposed to solar radiation can generate electricity.
(3) 'Solar power facility' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 46-3-67.
(b) No owner or operator of a solar power facility shall discard or dispose of or cause to
be discarded or disposed of a solar panel by placing it in a landfill, by placing it with other
municipal solid waste or commercial solid waste that is or will be delivered to a landfill,
or by any other manner except by delivery to a legitimate recycling facility.
(c) Any owner or operator of a solar power facility who violates subsection (b) of this
Code section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $20.00 for each offense. For
the purposes of this Code section, each solar panel that is discarded or disposed of in
violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall constitute a separate offense. The
civil penalty provided for in this subsection shall be recoverable in a civil action brought
in any court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General or any district attorney.
(d) The division shall identify and compile a list of legitimate recycling facilities in this
state where solar panels may be delivered for recycling and publish such list, along with
information relating to the prohibition contained in subsection (b) of this Code section, on
its public website and in any other location or in any other manner that the division deems
necessary to advise owners or operators of solar power facilities of the requirements of this
H. B. 320 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 55 0508S
Code section and members of the public of legitimate recycling facilities in this state where
solar panels may be delivered for recycling. The division is encouraged to provide
technical support and other support to regional landfills or regional solid waste disposal
facilities that desire to serve as legitimate recycling facilities for the purpose of recycling
solar panels and to counties and municipalities that desire to hold collection events for or
otherwise facilitate the recycling of solar panels in a manner pursuant to this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 320 (SUB)
- 3 -